Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Chapter 11

Livestock Sales

44-11-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Alternative livestock” means non-traditional livestock that are hoofed and captive-farmed for purposes of agricultural or recreational use, as defined by § 70-4-403(3);

“Breed association” means a bona fide livestock breed association which conducts sales of livestock breeds recognized by the department in which such association assumes responsibility for conducting the sales, assumes title to any livestock sold, and accrues a majority of profits from the sales;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Consignor” means any person consigning, shipping, or delivering livestock to a livestock market for sale, resale, or exchange;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Livestock” means cattle, calves, horses, mules, poultry, swine, sheep, goats, and alternative livestock;

“Livestock market” means any location where livestock is assembled and sold at public auction, on a commission basis, or otherwise for the compensation of the owner or operator, during regularly scheduled or special sales;

“Livestock producer” means any person who sells only livestock such person has raised or such person has owned and had in possession for a minimum of sixty (60) days;

“Operator” means any person conducting business as a livestock market;

“Person” means any person, firm, or corporation; and

“Representative” means an employee or designee of the commissioner.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2301; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 6.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment added the definitions for “alternative livestock”, “breed association”, “livestock market”, and “livestock producer”; deleted the definitions for “community sale” and “official vaccinate” which read: “ ‘Community sale’ means any sale or exchange of livestock held by any person at an established place of business or premises where the livestock is assembled for sale or exchange and is sold or exchanged at auction, or upon a commission basis, or at a private sale, at regular or irregular intervals but more frequently than three (3) times a year; provided, that ‘community sale’ does not apply to established public stockyards whose federal veterinary inspection is maintained, or to farm or purebred livestock sales;“‘Official vaccinate’ means a bovine animal vaccinated against brucellosis from four (4) through eight (8) months of age, under the supervision of a federal or state veterinary official, with a vaccine approved by the commissioner, permanently identified as such a vaccinate, and reported at the time of vaccination to the appropriate state or federal agency cooperating in the eradication of brucellosis;”; substituted “livestock market” for “community sale” in the definition of “consignor”; rewrote the definition of “livestock” which read: “‘Livestock’ means cattle, swine, sheep, goats, horses, mules, and poultry;”; rewrote the definition of “operator” which read: “‘Operator’ means any person holding, conducting or carrying on a community sale;”; and inserted “or designee” in the definition of “representative”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

Cross-References. Public livestock market charters, title 44, ch. 12.

Purchasers of livestock, licensing, title 44, ch. 10.

Comparative Legislation. Livestock sales:

Ala. Code §2-15-40 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §4-6-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 261.375 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 277.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-406 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-692 et seq.

Collateral References. Trade Regulation
872.

44-11-102. License required — Application.

No person shall conduct the business of a livestock market without a valid license from the department.

The application for a license shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the department, and shall include:

The name, address and phone number of the livestock market operator;

The location and description of the establishment or property where the livestock market is to be conducted;

A report of the types and volume of livestock to be handled, sold or exchanged;

A copy of property and fire insurance for the livestock market;

Proof the applicant has met the bonding requirements of 9 C.F.R. 201, et seq.; and

Such other information as the commissioner may require.

All applications shall be accompanied by the license fee required by § 44-11-104.

This chapter shall not be construed to include as a livestock market the following:

Any operation where Future Farmers, 4-H Club groups, or fairs conduct sales of livestock; or

Any livestock producer or breed association as defined by § 44-11-101.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 2; T.C.A., § 44-2302; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 7.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment rewrote this section which read: “(a) No person shall hold, operate, conduct, or carry on a community sale in this state without first securing a license therefor from the department.“(b) The application for a license shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the department, and shall set forth:“(1) The name and address of the community sale yard and the name of the operator of the yard;“(2) The location of the establishment or premises where the community sale is to be conducted;“(3) The types or kinds of livestock to be handled, sold or exchanged;“(4) A description of the facilities to be used in conducting the community sales; and“(5) Such other information as the department may require.“(c) All applications shall be accompanied by a bond and the fee required by §§44-11-103 and44-11-104.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-11-103. Local regulation or prohibition of exhibition of livestock restricted.

As used in this section:

“Exhibition of livestock” means a show or sale of livestock at a fair or elsewhere that is sponsored by or under the control of a county or independent agricultural society, school, university, breed association, fair association, or similar organization; and

“Local governing body” means the legislative body of a city, municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this state.

No local governing body shall adopt or continue in effect any ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, or other enactment regulating or prohibiting the exhibition of livestock in this state.

Subsection (b) does not apply to any ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, or other enactment regarding the exhibition of livestock in this state, when such enactment is otherwise authorized by state law or is related to reasonable restrictions regarding time, place, and manner consistent with other similar events or the protection of public health, safety, or welfare.

Acts 2020, ch. 742, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §44-11-103 (Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 3; 1961, ch. 65, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2303), concerning filing a bond when applying for a license to operate and conduct a community livestock sale, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 8, effective June 30, 2010.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 742, § 2. June 22, 2020.

44-11-104. Issuance of license — Fee.

The annual license fee to operate a livestock market shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

Upon receipt of an application for a license under this section, accompanied by the required bond and license fee, the department shall examine the application and if it finds the application to be in proper form and that the applicant has otherwise complied with this chapter, the department shall grant the license as applied for, subject to this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 4; T.C.A., § 44-2304; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 9; 2015, ch. 485, § 22.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “livestock market” for “community sale” in (a).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a) which read, “The fee for a license to operate a livestock market shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per annum.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

44-11-105. Form of licenses — Display — Renewal.

A separate license shall be required for each establishment or premises where a livestock market is operated or conducted. The original, or a certified copy of the license hereunder, shall be conspicuously displayed by the licensee in the sale ring or some other like prominent place in the establishment or premises licensed.

Licenses shall expire on June 30 of each year and shall be renewed annually upon like application and procedure as in the case of the original license.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 5; T.C.A., § 44-2305; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 10.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment rewrote this section which read: “(a) Licenses shall be in such form as the department may prescribe, and shall be under the seal of the department, and shall set forth:“(1) The name and address of the community sale yard, and the name of the operator of the yard;“(2) The location of the establishment or premises licensed;“(3) The kinds of livestock to be sold, exchanged, or handled;“(4) The period of the license; and“(5) Such other information as the department may determine.“(b) A separate license shall be required for each establishment or premises where a community sale is operated or conducted. The original, or a certified copy of the license hereunder, shall be conspicuously displayed by the licensee in the sale ring or some other like prominent place in the establishment or premises licensed.“(c) Licenses shall be renewed annually upon like application and procedure as in the case of the original license.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-11-106. Refusal to grant or renew license — Suspension or revocation — Grounds — Notice and hearing — Review.

The commissioner may decline to grant or to renew a license, or may suspend or revoke a license upon the following grounds:

The licensee has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, order, or regulation issued under this chapter;

The licensee has knowingly received on consignment or sold or exchanged stolen livestock or mortgaged livestock without authority from the owner or mortgagee;

The licensee has been guilty of misrepresentation, deception, or fraud in any material particular in securing the license;

The licensee has failed to keep records as required by this chapter;

The licensee has failed to practice measures of sanitation and has failed to provide for the adequate yarding, housing, holding, and feeding of livestock;

The licensee, in the case of livestock weighed on the licensee's scales and sold by weight, has knowingly quoted incorrect weights or has failed to have the scales regularly inspected and tested;

[Deleted by 2010 amendment.]

The licensee has engaged in any illegal activity on the premises where the community sale is located, the business violates the zoning regulations of any county, municipal, or regional planning commission, or the licensee has failed to comply with such rules and regulations as have been duly adopted in accordance with this chapter;

The licensee has failed to comply with the Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, compiled in 7 U.S.C. §§ 2901-2911, or the Agriculture Commodities Promotion Act, compiled in § 43-29-101 et seq.;

The licensee has failed to make payment after a sale or has made payment with insufficient funds to consigners for livestock sold through the market; or

The licensee has been determined to be insolvent by the commissioner.

When any of the foregoing have not been fully complied with, or if there has been a violation of this chapter, the commissioner may give notice to the applicant for a license, or a holder of a license, that the commissioner will conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining whether the commissioner should decline to grant, renew, or suspend or revoke a license pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3. The findings of the commissioner shall be final, and may be reviewed in the chancery court of Davidson County, by the common law writ of certiorari. When zoning is the question involved, the commissioner shall notify the applicant or holder of the license of the violation, and the applicant or holder shall then have only the rights granted in the zoning ordinance or regulation relative to a hearing and appeal, and shall prosecute the application for a hearing and appeal solely under the particular local zoning ordinance or regulation.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 7; T.C.A., § 44-2306; Acts 2010, ch. 717, §§ 11, 12.

Compiler's Notes. The next to last sentence of subsection (b) of this section is superseded by §4-5-322(b) to the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between that sentence and the provisions of §4-5-322(b). See §4-5-103(b).

Amendments. The 2010 amendment, in (a), deleted (7) which read: “The licensee has failed to post a bond or give other security as required herein; or”, added (9)-(11); and, in (b), added “pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3.” to the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second and third sentences which read: “No hearing shall be held without giving the applicant or the holder of a license at least ten (10) days' written notice thereof. The hearings shall be conducted at the time and place designated by the commissioner, and the applicant or the holder of a license shall be entitled to be represented by counsel at such hearings.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-11-107. Sale of livestock — Regulations governing — Inspection — Diseased animals.

Each livestock market may be under the direct supervision of a representative of the department. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no livestock known to be infected with or known to have been exposed to any contagious, infectious or communicable animal disease or infestation shall be consigned to or sold through any livestock market. The representative may inspect all livestock that is offered for sale and may prohibit the movement of any animals that in the representative's opinion are diseased or that are likely to be carriers of disease, until final inspection is made by a qualified, accredited veterinarian, as to their condition. If, upon examination, an infectious, contagious or communicable disease or infestation is found, such animals may be sold only for immediate slaughter to a recognized slaughterer where veterinary inspection is maintained; or, the owner may, upon submission of an affidavit of ownership for at least sixty (60) days prior to sale date, return them to the original premises, where a strict quarantine must be maintained. The representative shall also issue or cause to be issued all necessary quarantines for such animals as are sold for immediate slaughter or are returned to the original premises. A copy of the quarantine shall be sent to the state veterinarian immediately following issuance, and instructions given the owner that the truck moving the quarantined animals to slaughter or returning them to the original premises must be cleaned and disinfected before being used again to transport livestock. The representative shall supervise the cleaning and disinfecting of the yards and pens at such time as may be necessary, using only those disinfectants approved by the animal disease eradication branch of the agricultural research service of the United States department of agriculture.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 9; T.C.A., § 44-2307; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 13.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment deleted the (a) designation, in former (a), substituted “Each livestock market may be” for “Each community sale shall be” at the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “livestock market” for “community sale” at the end of the second sentence, substituted “shall” for “may” twice in the third sentence; and deleted former (b)-(e) which read: “(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no female cattle or bulls more than eight (8) months of age shall be removed from the premises where the community sale is conducted, except for immediate slaughter within ten (10) days, unless such cattle either:“(1) Have been tested for brucellosis and found negative within thirty (30) days prior to date of sale, and are accompanied by a certificate of health showing the results of the test;“(2) Are under thirty (30) months of age and were officially vaccinated against brucellosis with vaccine approved by the commissioner at not less than four (4) months nor more than eight (8) months of age, are positively identified and are accompanied by an official certificate of vaccination or have the official calfhood vaccination tattoo in the ear; or“(3) Are in a certified brucellosis-free herd at the time of the sale, and are accompanied by an official certificate of health so certifying.“Cattle that do not come within the above classifications must be tested and found negative to a brucellosis test before being released from the community sale yard. The owner may, upon submission of an affidavit of ownership for at least sixty (60) days prior to sale date, return the cattle to the original premises, and the entire herd placed under quarantine until tested for brucellosis.“(c) All female cattle are classed as breeding cattle, and as such must comply with the requirements governing breeding cattle.“(d) Community sales handling livestock during inclement weather shall be equipped with facilities for housing the livestock during the inclement weather. If livestock is held on the premises for more than ten (10) hours, then facilities for feeding and watering the livestock so held shall be provided.“(e) In case any community sale sells livestock by weight, the scales upon which the livestock is weighed shall be regularly inspected and tested.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

Cross-References. Cruelty to animals, §39-14-202.

Humane treatment of animals not subject to state game and fish laws, §5-9-110.

44-11-108. Records of operator.

Each operator of a livestock market shall keep the following records for each lot of livestock consigned to or sold through such livestock market, namely:

The name and address of the consignor;

A description of the livestock which shall include ear tag number or back tag number, or animal descriptors such as livestock sex, color, marking, or weight; and

The date the livestock was received and sold;

The name and address of the purchaser of the livestock; and

The price for which the livestock was sold or exchanged and the commission or other fees charged by the livestock market, including such inspection fees as are required hereunder.

These records shall be kept by the operator of a livestock market at the establishment or premises where the sale is held and conducted or such other convenient place as may be approved by the department. They shall be open for inspection by all officers or inspectors charged with the enforcement of this law, and they shall be preserved and retained for a period of at least two (2) years.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 8; T.C.A., § 44-2308; Acts 2010, ch. 717, §§ 14, 15.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “livestock market” for “community sale” twice in the introductory paragraph of (a), once in (a)(4) and once in (b); and rewrote (a)(2) which read: “A description of the livestock, which may be by tag number, marking, or weight;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-11-109. Sale or traffic in livestock on public property near licensed premises unlawful.

It is unlawful to sell, or offer to sell, to buy, or offer to buy, livestock within two thousand (2,000) feet of a licensed livestock market property.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 6; T.C.A., § 44-2309; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 16.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “within two thousand (2,000) feet of a licensed livestock market property” for “on any public property located within two thousand feet (2,000) of the premises where licensed community sales are held”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-11-110. Administration of chapter — Personnel.

The state veterinarian shall administer this chapter.

The state veterinarian is authorized to employ a chief inspector and shall have one (1) inspector assigned to work in each grand division of the state. In addition, the state veterinarian may employ part-time inspectors who may be assigned in particular localities or at particular community sales.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 11; T.C.A., § 44-2310.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, §§4-1-201 —4-1-204.

44-11-111. License fees to be used in administration of chapter.

The license fees collected under this chapter shall be devoted exclusively to its administration and shall be kept in a separate account by the state treasurer, and no part of the fees collected under this chapter shall at any time become a part of the general fund of the state.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 10; T.C.A., § 44-2311.

44-11-112. Rules and regulations.

The department may make reasonable rules and regulations for carrying out this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 13; T.C.A., § 44-2312.

44-11-113. Inspections authorized.

For the purpose of carrying out this chapter and making inspections under this chapter, the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized representative has the right to enter the establishment or premises where any community sale is held and to inspect its records at all times.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 13; T.C.A., § 44-2313.

44-11-114. Certain businesses excepted.

This chapter shall not apply to the business of buying or assembling livestock for the purpose of prompt shipment to or slaughter in any livestock market or packing house where veterinary inspection is regularly maintained under the animal disease eradication branch of the agricultural research services, United States department of agriculture.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 12; T.C.A., § 44-2314.

44-11-115. Violations of chapter — Penalty.

Any livestock operator, or any person who engages in business as a livestock market without a license, as herein required, or who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules and regulations lawfully issued hereunder, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1957, ch. 208, § 14; T.C.A. § 44-2315; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2010, ch. 717, § 17.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment rewrote this section which read: “A person who operates a community sale without a license, as herein required, or who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules and regulations lawfully issued hereunder, commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day upon which livestock is sold or exchanged at any community sale constitutes a separate offense.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Collateral References.

Extent of liability of seller of livestock infected with communicable disease. 14 A.L.R.4th 1096.

44-11-116. Injunction.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule hereunder, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, bring an action in the chancery court of any county in this state to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule hereunder.

Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 18.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.